Colorado, session 2026A, HB1364.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 118 to title
24 as follows:
ARTICLE 118
Consumer Price Index for Calendar Year 2025
24-118-101. Consumer price index.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, FOR THE
PURPOSES OF CALCULATING THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR THE 2025
CALENDAR YEAR AS NECESSARY TO COMPARE THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX
FOR 2025 TO THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR 2024 AND AS NECESSARY TO
COMPARE THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR 2026 TO THE CONSUMER PRICE
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

INDEX FOR 2025, THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX IS DETERMINED BY
AVERAGING THE TWO SEMI-ANNUAL REPORTS PRODUCED BY THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS FOR THE
2025 CALENDAR YEAR FOR THE RELEVANT REGION IN THE FOLLOWING
SECTIONS:
(a) IN TITLE 4:
(I) SECTION 4-9-625;
(b) IN TITLE 6:
(I) SECTION 6-1-112;
(c) IN TITLE 8:
(I) SECTION 8-6-101.5; AND
(II) SECTION 8-73-116;
(d) IN TITLE 10:
(I) SECTION 10-16-104; AND
(II) SECTION 10-16-1401;
(e) IN TITLE 12:
(I) SECTION 12-30-102;
(II) SECTION 12-115-121;
(III) SECTION 12-220-310;
(IV) SECTION 12-220-507;
(V) SECTION 12-240-131;
(VI) SECTION 12-255-130;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(VII) SECTION 12-280-139;
(VIII) SECTION 12-280-140;
(IX) SECTION 12-280-142; AND
(X) SECTION 12-315-123;
(f) IN TITLE 13:
(I) SECTION 13-10-113;
(II) SECTION 13-21-102.5;
(III) SECTION 13-21-203.7; AND
(IV) SECTION 13-64-302;
(g) IN TITLE 15:
(I) SECTION 15-1-1106;
(h) IN TITLE 18:
(I) SECTION 18-4-511;
(i) IN TITLE 22:
(I) SECTION 22-20-114;
(II) SECTION 22-30.5-112;
(III) SECTION 22-30.5-513;
(IV) SECTION 22-32-104;
(V) SECTION 22-32-119;
(VI) SECTION 22-43.7-104;
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(VII) SECTION 22-54-103.3; AND
(VIII) SECTION 22-55-102;
(j) IN TITLE 23:
(I) SECTION 23-3.1-306.5; AND
(II) SECTION 23-3.9-302;
(k) IN TITLE 24:
(I) SECTION 24-9-106;
(II) SECTION 24-10-114;
(III) SECTION 24-31-1203;
(IV) SECTION 24-38.5-125;
(V) SECTION 24-38.5-302;
(VI) SECTION 24-65.5-103.7;
(VII) SECTION 24-72-205; AND
(VIII) SECTION 24-77-102;
(l) IN TITLE 25:
(I) SECTION 25-1-134;
(II) SECTION 25-3-103;
(III) SECTION 25-3-105;
(IV) SECTION 25-3.5-208;
(V) SECTION 25-7.5-102;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(VI) SECTION 25-7-122;
(VII) SECTION 25-8-608;
(VIII) SECTION 25-17-713; AND
(IX) SECTION 25-57-110;
(m) IN TITLE 26.5:
(I) SECTION 26.5-4-203;
(n) IN TITLE 29:
(I) SECTION 29-4-1201;
(o) IN TITLE 30:
(I) SECTION 30-2-102;
(II) SECTION 30-20-604.5; AND
(III) SECTION 30-20-1403;
(p) IN TITLE 31:
(I) SECTION 31-16-101;
(q) IN TITLE 32:
(I) SECTION 32-1-1001;
(II) SECTION 32-9-119;
(III) SECTION 32-13-107;
(IV) SECTION 32-13-110; AND
(V) SECTION 32-14-114;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(r) IN TITLE 33:
(I) SECTION 33-4-102;
(II) SECTION 33-9-203;
(III) SECTION 33-10.5-104.5;
(IV) SECTION 33-12-108; AND
(V) SECTION 33-60-104;
(s) IN TITLE 34:
(I) SECTION 34-60-135;
(t) IN TITLE 37:
(I) SECTION 37-42-113;
(u) IN TITLE 38:
(I) SECTION 38-12-203.5;
(II) SECTION 38-33.3-116;
(III) SECTION 38-33.3-123; AND
(IV) SECTION 38-37-104;
(v) IN TITLE 39:
(I) SECTION 39-1-104.2;
(II) SECTION 39-2-117;
(III) SECTION 39-3-119.5;
(IV) SECTION 39-22-129;
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(V) SECTION 39-22-130;
(VI) SECTION 39-22-543;
(VII) SECTION 39-22-547;
(VIII) SECTION 39-31-101;
(IX) SECTION 39-31-104.5; AND
(X) SECTION 39-37-301;
(w) IN TITLE 40:
(I) SECTION 40-2-104;
(II) SECTION 40-2-135;
(III) SECTION 40-7-105; AND
(IV) SECTION 40-8.7-105.5;
(x) IN TITLE 41:
(I) SECTION 41-3-103;
(y) IN TITLE 42:
(I) SECTION 42-1-210;
(II) SECTION 42-4-310;
(III) SECTION 42-4-1307; AND
(IV) SECTION 42-5-204;
(z) IN TITLE 43:
(I) SECTION 43-4-218;
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

(II) SECTION 43-4-804;
(III) SECTION 43-4-805;
(IV) SECTION 43-4-806;
(V) SECTION 43-4-1202; AND
(VI) SECTION 43-4-1302; AND
(aa) IN TITLE 44:
(I) SECTION 44-3-103;
(II) SECTION 44-3-801; AND
(III) SECTION 44-10-803.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026. Amend as added by House Bill 26-1410 section 2, Part IV (3)(A),
the affected totals, and footnote 13 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(3) SCHOOL DISTRICT OPERATIONS
(A) Public School Finance
Administration 2,645,074 2,380,153 264,921a
(17.1 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Financial Transparency System
Maintenance 97,731 97,731a
(1.0 FTE)
School Finance Audit Payments 3,000,000 3,000,000b
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
State Share of Districts' Total
Program Funding 5,567,435,495 4,318,686,861c 1,248,748,634d
5,576,489,047 1,257,802,186d
Extended High School13 4,084,701 4,084,701a
4,088,892 4,088,892a
District Per Pupil
Reimbursements for Juveniles
Held in Jail 10,000 10,000b
At-risk Supplemental Aid 3,504,995 3,504,995a
Contingency Reserve Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000e
5,581,777,996
5,590,835,739
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
b These amounts shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102 (5.4)(a)(II), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $1,334,183,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $1,010,525,540 $1,019,579,092 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $238,223,094 shall be
from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S. Of the amount appropriated from the State Education Fund, an estimated $213,273,564 is from the Kids
Matter Account created in the State Education Fund pursuant to Section 22-55-103 (6)(b), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from
the portion of the State Education Fund that is not the Kids Matter Account are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
e This amount shall be from the Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 22-54-117 (1)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART IV
(EDUCATION) $7,865,396,771 $4,587,560,682a $2,371,461,010b $56,340,311c $850,034,768d
$7,874,454,514 $2,380,518,753b
a Of this amount, $1,334,181,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
b Of this amount, $10,123,822 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $43,900,000 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
13 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, Extended High School -- Pursuant to Section 22-35-108.5 (2)(b)(III), C.R.S.,
the purpose of this footnote is to specify what portion of this appropriation is intended to be available for the Teacher Recruitment Education and Preparation
(TREP) Program for FY 2026-27. It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department of Education be authorized to utilize up to $2,680,250 $2,683,000
of this appropriation to fund qualified students identified as TREP Program participants. This amount is calculated based on an estimated 250 FTE TREP
Program participants funded at a rate of $10,721 $10,732 per FTE pursuant to Section 22-54-103.5 (8), C.R.S., and Section 22-54-104 (4.7), C.R.S.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1364

SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1410
becomes law, in which case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date
of this act or House Bill 26-1410, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1364